Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 1

General Provisions

11-3-101. “Park” defined.

For the purposes of the department of environment and conservation, “park” means and includes any and all areas of land heretofore or hereafter acquired by the state, which by reason of having natural and historic features, scenic beauty or location, possess natural or potential physical, aesthetic, scientific, creative, social or other recreational values, and are dedicated to and forever reserved and administered by the state for the recreational and cultural use and enjoyment of the people.

Acts 1937, ch. 266, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-301.

Cross-References. Acts not incorporated in code left unrepealed, § 1-2-105.

Forbidding of fires in period of drought, § 8-1-108.

Nonprofit organizations for support and enhancement of state parks, title 11, ch. 3, part 2.

11-3-102. Preservation in natural condition.

Every park under this part shall be preserved in a natural condition so far as may be consistent with its human use and safety, and all improvements shall be of such character as not to lessen its inherent recreational value.

Acts 1937, ch. 266, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-302.

Cross-References. Powers of department of environment and conservation, § 4-3-504.

Removal or injury of trees or growth, penalty, §§ 39-14-408, 39-14-410.

11-3-103. Classification and designation of areas — Administration of state park system — Division of parks and recreation.

All parks, monuments and other areas used primarily for recreational purposes shall be properly classified under the supervision of the department of environment and conservation, and the department shall, upon approval of the classification, designate the areas comprising the state park system, the state park system to be administered through a division of parks and recreation in the department.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the state park designated as “Pickett State Park” is hereby redesignated as “Pickett Civilian Conservation Corps (CCC) Memorial State Park.”

The department shall erect suitable markers and/or affix suitable signs designating such park as the “Pickett Civilian Conservation Corps (CCC) Memorial State Park.”

Acts 1937, ch. 266, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-303; Acts 1994, ch. 951, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of responsibility for maintaining roads and parking areas in parks from the department of conservation to the department of transportation, see Executive Order 39 (February 11, 1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Responsibility for maintenance of the Narrows of the Harpeth Road, the one-mile road in the Harpeth River State Park that provides public access to the Narrows of the Harpeth site. OAG 15-49, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (6/8/15).

11-3-104. Cooperation for park purposes.

The state, counties, municipalities, and all political subdivisions of Tennessee are empowered to cooperate with each other, and with other states, and with the United States government, or any agency thereof, in planning, establishing, improving, or maintaining any park or other recreational area or monument.

Acts 1937, ch. 266, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-304.

11-3-105. Eminent domain.

In the acquisition of sites or boundaries of land for parks to be used for any one (1) or more of the purposes recited in this part, the state is authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain when the governor so orders.

Acts 1941, ch. 104, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-305.

11-3-106. Expenditures by political subdivisions.

Every county, municipality, and other political subdivision of this state is empowered to expend money from available sources to aid in the purchase of areas within the county, municipality or political subdivision for park purposes within the meaning of this part, the park to become the property of the state, to be improved, cared for and administered by the department of environment and conservation as a part of the state park system hereinabove mentioned; provided, that the governor and commissioner of environment and conservation shall have first agreed in writing to accept the same.

Acts 1937, ch. 266, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-306.

Attorney General Opinions. Responsibility for maintenance of the Narrows of the Harpeth Road, the one-mile road in the Harpeth River State Park that provides public access to the Narrows of the Harpeth site. OAG 15-49, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (6/8/15).

11-3-107. Parks and recreation division employees — Commissioned law enforcement officers.

The division of parks and recreation is authorized to employ a suitable number of persons as park rangers, ranger naturalists, park managers and in other positions, however designated or named, having qualifications established by the division of parks and recreation, and approved by the department of human resources. They will manage and supervise the operation of the state parks and other recreational areas managed or administered by the division; provided, that persons employed as park rangers as of January 1, 1986, who meet the qualifications set out by this section as it existed on January 1, 1986, shall not be denied promotion to a position as park manager or any equivalent position because of not meeting any more stringent qualifications which may be established pursuant to this subsection (a).

Employees of the division of parks and recreation, when properly trained and qualified, may be commissioned by the commissioner of environment and conservation as law enforcement officers. When so commissioned, they shall have all of the police powers necessary to enforce all state laws, rules and regulations, within the state parks, state forests, state natural areas, all other state-owned areas under the jurisdiction of the division, and all recreational areas which are administered or managed by the division under lease, easement or other agreement with any public or private owner of the property. The commissioned employees of the division shall have all police powers necessary to apprehend and arrest any person within the state, for any violation of state law or rule or regulation of the division committed on any state park or other area described above. They shall enforce the laws, rules and regulations and maintain order, for the protection of state property and the public welfare. They shall have the right to carry firearms or other arms while on duty as commissioned law enforcement officers of the division. It is the responsibility of the division to assure that law enforcement duties are pursued with the utmost awareness and care and not to the detriment of the primary responsibilities of rangers and managers, which are to provide for visitor information and education, to manage and maintain park resources and personnel and to conduct recreation programs.

Notwithstanding title 12, chapter 2, part 4, when the division of parks and recreation makes a determination to retire an equine from service, the park ranger, ranger naturalist, park manager or any other similar employee who has used the equine to carry out such person's duties as a law enforcement officer or as an employee of the division of parks and recreation, may take possession of the equine upon paying to the division of parks and recreation the value assigned to the equine pursuant to subdivision (c)(3).

Upon taking possession of a retired equine pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), the park ranger, ranger naturalist, park manager or any other similar employee shall be responsible for all costs associated with maintaining such equine.

The division of parks and recreation is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, necessary to carry out this subsection (c) including establishing a value for the equine at the time the decision is made to retire the equine from service.

The division of parks and recreation, with the approval of the department of human resources, shall establish standards of training and qualification for the commissioning of employees as law enforcement officers, and for in-service training of its commissioned employees. Training standards shall be consistent with those established by a recognized agency such as the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission, the Jerry F. Agee Tennessee Law Enforcement Training Academy or the department of interior, national park service.

After twenty-five (25) years of honorable service by a commissioned employee, the department of environment and conservation, bureau of state parks and recreation shall authorize the employee, upon retirement, to retain such employee's service weapon in recognition of the employee's many years of good and faithful service. A commissioned employee who retires on disability retirement also may be authorized to retain that employee's service weapon.

Acts 1947, ch. 228, §§ 1-5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 630.5A (Williams, §§ 630.30-630.34); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-307; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 93, § 1; Acts 1986, ch. 912, § 4; 2002, ch. 548, § 1; 2010, ch. 843, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Pursuant to Acts 2007, ch. 60, references to the department of personnel were changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

11-3-108. Authority to sell surplus park land — Authorization.

The department of environment and conservation is authorized to sell certain tracts of land which are surplus to the needs and benefit of the state of Tennessee, and now being used for state park purposes. The land shall be sold only upon authorization of the national park service, department of interior, and under such terms and conditions as it may require.

Acts 1949, ch. 163, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.5B; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-308.

11-3-109. Execution of deed — Approval.

Upon receipt of such authorization and terms and conditions from the national park service, the commissioner of environment and conservation is hereby authorized to execute a deed on behalf of the state of Tennessee, transferring and conveying whatever interest the state of Tennessee might have in the tract of land.

The deed of conveyance shall be approved by the governor and attested by the secretary of state.

Acts 1949, ch. 163, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.5C; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-309.

11-3-110. Use of proceeds of sale.

All funds received from any of such sales of land shall be invested in capital improvements in that particular state park from which the sale was made.

Acts 1949, ch. 163, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.5D; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-310.

11-3-111. Lease and license arrangements — Special events permits and licenses — Native craft products.

The commissioner of environment and conservation, with the approval of the state building commission and attorney general and reporter, may enter into lease agreements for the operation of existing facilities and the development, construction, and operation of new facilities on lands under the control or supervision of the department of environment and conservation where the leases are deemed necessary, in the discretion of the commissioner, for improved utilization of state lands and facilities in the public interest. Such facilities or developments shall include, but not be limited to: boat docks, fishing piers, camp sites, trailer camps, golf courses, recreational facilities, hotels, motels, restaurants, retail stores, forests, natural areas, and historic sites. The leases may contain a provision giving the lessee the option of renewing the lease upon like terms and conditions and for the same term. The leaseholds may be sold; provided, that they have been approved by the commissioner, the governor, and the attorney general and reporter, and any sale made without their approval shall be void. Any lease agreements entered into in accordance with this section shall be entered into only after sealed bids have been submitted to the commissioner of environment and conservation on the facilities to be leased and all applicable provisions of law have been complied with which relate to contracts, property management, and leasing, including such regulations as may be promulgated by appropriate state officials.

The director of the division of parks and recreation, with the approval of the commissioners of environment and conservation and finance and administration, may enter into license agreements which allow the licensee to operate facilities or to conduct business operations within state parks, where this is deemed necessary for the best utilization of state parks for public recreational purposes, under the following conditions:

The intended use or occupancy of park lands or facilities by the licensee is seasonal or is of a nature that makes it inappropriate for the state to enter into a lease agreement;

The license is for a term not to exceed three (3) years, and may be terminated by the director, without cause; and

The license agreement is entered into only after written proposals have been solicited by advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the park is located, except that a license agreement for a term not to exceed ninety (90) days may be negotiated and entered into without such advertisement in order to obtain an operator for a facility which is vacant because a previous lease or license has expired or has been terminated.

The director may issue permits or licenses to any government, public agency, individual, corporation, association or other organization for terms of not more than ten (10) days for the use of areas or facilities within state parks for special events, where this is deemed to enhance the use of the parks for public recreational purposes. The commissioner of environment and conservation shall promulgate rules which establish policies, rules and procedures applicable to the issuance of permits and licenses pursuant to this subsection (c). Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Such rules shall also be reviewed and approved by the commissioner of finance and administration before becoming effective.

Any person or business entity who occupies property in a state park, under a lease or license, in which crafts or souvenirs are sold, shall maintain an inventory, twenty-five percent (25%) of which is in crafts native to this state, if such crafts are readily available. This provision shall become the basis of a section of every such new lease or license and every such lease or license that is renegotiated with the present tenant or licensee.

Acts 1976, ch. 783, § 1; 1977, ch. 176, § 1; 1979, ch. 140, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-313; Acts 1980, ch. 696, § 1; 1986, ch. 912, § 5; 1988, ch. 652, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1988, ch. 1034, § 1 provided that the authority granted by this section and § 11-1-112, relative to lease and licensing arrangements in state parks, shall apply to any arrangement approved by the commissioner of conservation (now environment and conservation) to allow private contractors to construct and develop a golf course at Chickasaw State Park, and the commissioner is empowered to enter into a contract for such construction and development, subject to approval of the state building commission.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

11-3-112. Purchasing authority.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner of environment and conservation has the authority to cause to be purchased and to develop the method for purchasing, without the approval of any other agency of state government, services, raw materials, merchandise for resale, supplies and equipment necessary for provision of quality services for state park operations. This section shall not be construed to allow the department to contract for services previously accomplished for the parks by state employees or for services that could reasonably be expected to be accomplished by state employees.

It is the responsibility of the commissioner of environment and conservation to develop policies and procedures to ensure, to the extent practicable, that purchases made on behalf of park operations are at the lowest possible price while at the same time ensuring quality and timely delivery. The commissioner shall file such policies and procedures with the procurement commission for the commission's review and approval.

The commissioner has the authority to purchase supplies and equipment through the department of general services and is encouraged to exercise the option to purchase through the department under title 12, chapter 3, in circumstances which are advantageous for the timely delivery of low cost, quality products.

For the purposes of this section, “park operations” means the following facilities at state parks: inns, cabins, restaurants, golf courses, gift shops, marinas, snack bars, and vending machines.

No expenditure of public funds pursuant to this section shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000d).

Acts 2001, ch. 407, §§ 2-4; 2004, ch. 773, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (e), concerning a report to the general assembly no later than February 1, 2003, on the success for failure of the purchasing authority, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 11-3-112 (Acts 1974, ch. 420, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-311; Acts 1995, ch. 107, § 1), concerning free use of golf courses by older citizens, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 950, § 1, effective June 23, 2000. For new law see § 11-3-121.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 11-3-112 is not applicable to the proposed transaction, but T.C.A. § 12-2-116 is applicable and provides specific and separate authority for the Tennessee Department of General Services to enter into an agreement for the private redevelopment, construction, and operation of the facilities at Fall Creek Falls State Park. OAG 17-16, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (3/2/2017).

11-3-113. Reimbursement of green fees from certain agencies.

If the golf course is located in a state park, but operated by a municipal or county government agency under contract with the department of environment and conservation, the department shall reimburse the operating agency for any green fees waived under [former] § 11-3-112 [repealed] and this section.

Acts 1974, ch. 420, § 2; T.C.A., § 11-312.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 11-3-112, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 950, § 1, effective June 23, 2000. For new law, see § 11-3-121.

11-3-114. Clear-cutting.

The commissioner of environment and conservation shall prohibit the forestry practice of clear-cutting in all state parks. The department of environment and conservation shall not conduct clear-cutting operations in such parks, nor permit any other person or lessee to conduct clear-cutting operations in such parks.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), clear-cutting may be permitted in state parks in cases of natural disaster or insect infestation provided that the department of environment and conservation has determined prior to any such clear-cutting that it is a reasonable and appropriate response to such disaster or infestation and that it is consistent with the department's duty to preserve and maintain the parks. Such clear-cutting may occur only in a manner approved in advance by the department.

Acts 2002, ch. 608, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 11-3-114 (Acts 1977, ch. 251, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-314), concerning hunting and fishing by disabled persons without payment of park fees, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 950, § 1, effective June 23, 2000. For new law see § 11-3-121.

11-3-115. Individual honored by park dedication need not be deceased.

No individual shall be disqualified from having a park named in dedication to the individual based solely on the fact that the individual is not deceased.

Acts 2009, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 11-3-115 (Acts 1977, ch. 252, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-315), concerning hunting and fishing by persons over 65 without payment of park fees, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 950, § 1, effective June 23, 2000. For new law see § 11-3-121.

11-3-116 — 11-3-119. [Reserved.]

The department of environment and conservation is hereby directed to formulate a long-range plan, hereinafter referred to as a “management plan” for each state park. Each such management plan shall include the following:

Funding requirements for state parks and an analysis of whether the revenue-generating facilities on the park are self-sustaining;

Facilities preservation, maintenance and utilization;

Management and personnel staffing, training, compensation and professional development;

Preservation, development and expansion of existing and new park resources and facilities;

Educational programming; and

Land acquisition.

Each management plan shall include goals and projections for state parks for the next ten (10) years and shall be updated every five (5) years by the department. Each management plan shall be posted on the department's website. Prior to updating each management plan, the department shall conduct public hearings after public notice has been given in accordance with title 8, chapter 44. Public hearings shall be conducted in each park or in the vicinity of each park regarding any update to the management plan. Notice of these public hearings shall be given to any friends groups or other groups with a particular interest in the particular park. The department shall consider all written and oral comments received in these hearings and shall document its responses to such comments. The department shall submit by March 1 of each year, to the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate, a report outlining any major deviations from the management plans in the previous year and the reasons therefore.

The department shall not commence construction on any new capital project which costs in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in any state park if it is not provided for in the park's current management plan and the project has been approved by the state building commission. The construction costs for such new capital projects other than those provided for in the management plan shall not be funded until the management plan is appropriately updated.

Acts 1998, ch. 1083, § 6; 2010, ch. 857, § 1; 2012, ch. 604, § 10; 2013, ch. 236, § 6.

11-3-121. Rate discounts.

The commissioner shall offer discounted rates for activities at the state parks to senior citizens, disabled persons, state employees, members of the Tennessee national guard, and any other group that the commissioner deems appropriate for such treatment. The specific activities where these discounts would apply as well as the timing and amount will be left to the commissioner's discretion.

The commissioner shall offer discounted rates for activities at state parks to veterans who are Tennessee residents.

The commissioner shall offer a year-round discount in the amount of no less than fifty percent (50%) for camping fees at state parks to veterans who have any service-connected disability that is determined by the veterans administration to constitute a one hundred percent (100%) permanent total disability. Certification from the veterans' administration indicating the veteran's percentage of service-connected disability must be presented in order to receive the discounted fee.

Except for the discount required by subdivision (b)(1)(B), the commissioner may determine the specific activities for which other discounts would apply, as well as the timing and amount of each discount; provided, that the other discounts must only be offered to resident veterans during the off season.

For purposes of this subsection (b), “veteran” means a former member of the United States armed forces or a former member of a reserve or Tennessee national guard unit who was called into active military service of the United States, as defined in § 58-1-102, and who served honorably, as defined in § 49-7-102.

For purposes of this subsection (b), “off season” means a period or periods of time, as determined by the commissioner, during which state park activities and facilities traditionally operate at less than full capacity.

No public official shall be given the right to play golf free for life or for any other extended period of time on courses in state parks, unless such action is authorized by the agriculture and natural resources subcommittee of the house of representatives, and approved by such standing committee of the house of representatives, as well as approved by the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate. Such prohibition includes green fees, golf carts and free supplies or equipment. Nothing in this subsection (c) shall prohibit the management of a golf course in state parks from occasionally extending free play to such public officials under appropriate circumstances.

Acts 2000, ch. 950, § 2; 2003, ch. 73, § 1; 2009, ch. 207, § 1; 2012, ch. 604, § 11; 2013, ch. 236, § 8; 2019, ch. 389, § 1.

11-3-122. Driving a golf cart within state park.

In state parks, a golf cart, as defined by § 55-1-123, may only be driven on golf courses in accordance with state park rules and policies and on the paved roads within the campgrounds, subject to regulation by state parks to protect public safety. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department of environment and conservation from requiring a valid driver license for the operation of a golf cart within the properties described in this section.

Acts 2008, ch. 1081, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1081, § 2 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to require the posting of signage to implement the provisions of the act.

11-3-123. Manner of maintenance — Easy access.

The department of environment and conservation is encouraged to maintain the state park system in a manner that is conducive to use by all persons and that provides such persons with easy access to all public areas within the parks.

Acts 2008, ch. 1081, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1081, § 2 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to require the posting of signage to implement the provisions of the act.